Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 4. Experience Rating.

Collateral references. —

76 Am. Jur. 2d, Unemployment Compensation, §§ 43-75, 196, 197, 209.

81 C.J.S., Social Security and Public Welfare, §§ 211-234.

Unemployment compensation benefits where, during the base year, employee worked in different states for same employer. 9 ALR2d 646.

Repayment of unemployment compensation benefits erroneously paid. 90 ALR3d 987.

Sec. 23.20.280.
Eligible employer.

An employer is eligible for a rate determination in accordance with the provisions of AS

23.20.280

—

23.20.310

and the department regulations if the employer has been subject to this chapter throughout not less than the four consecutive calendar quarters ending with the computation date and remains subject to this chapter into the calendar quarter which immediately precedes the effective date of the rate. An employer is not eligible for a rate determination under AS

23.20.280

—

23.20.310

if, with respect to a calendar quarter in or preceding the employer’s qualifying period, the employer has failed to file contribution or payroll reports or to pay contributions, interest, and penalties required by this chapter within 60 days after the computation date or within 10 days after the department has mailed the employer written notice of the delinquency or of failure to file reports, or of both, by registered or certified mail to the employer’s last address of record, whichever is the later date.

A report made arbitrarily for an employer by the department under AS

23.20.230

does not entitle an employer to a rate determination under AS

23.20.280

—

23.20.310

, but the report may be used to establish a rate determination in the discretion of the commissioner.

An employer who, because of failure to pay contributions or file reports timely, does not qualify for a rate determination under AS

23.20.280

—

23.20.310

shall pay contributions at the highest rate provided in AS

23.20.280

—

23.20.310

.

History.

(§ 11 ch 60 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 13 SLA 1962; am § 6 ch 43 SLA 1973; am §§ 30, 31 ch 9 SLA 1980)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.281.
Ineligible employer.

An employer who has been subject to this chapter less than four calendar quarters immediately preceding the computation date is not entitled to a rate determination under AS

23.20.280

—

23.20.310

and the employer shall pay contributions at the standard rates specified in AS

23.20.170(b)

.

History.

(§ 37 ch 9 SLA 1980)

Sec. 23.20.285.
Quarterly decline quotients.

The department shall determine each eligible employer’s contribution rate by the procedures set out in AS

23.20.280

—

23.20.310

. The department shall put the employer’s quarterly payrolls in chronological order beginning with the first calendar quarter in the qualifying period and ending with the last calendar quarter in the period. If an employer’s payroll in a calendar quarter is less than the payroll in the preceding quarter in the qualifying period, the quarterly decline quotient shall be computed to at least nine decimal places by dividing the amount of the decline by the amount of the payroll in the preceding calendar quarter.

For the purpose of computing quarterly decline quotients, the department may, by regulation, prescribe (1) the manner in which wages paid in the form of annual bonuses or other lump-sum payments for service performed over a period of more than three months are apportioned among the calendar quarters of the calendar year in which the service was performed; and (2) the method for making adjustments in quarterly payrolls to eliminate the effect upon quarterly decline quotients resulting from unemployment which would not be compensable by reason of the labor dispute provision of AS

23.20.383

.

The department shall determine the sum of each eligible employer’s decline quotients and shall weight the sum by adding to it 1.000000000 for each quarter in the employer’s qualifying period in which the employer has no payroll, which quarter immediately follows a quarter in which the employer has no payroll. Each eligible employer’s average quarterly decline quotient shall be computed to the ninth decimal place by dividing the sum of the quarterly decline quotients for the employer, weighted when required by this section, by the number of quarters in the employer’s qualifying period less one.

History.

(§ 11 ch 60 SLA 1960; am § 32 ch 9 SLA 1980)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.290.
Rate determination.

The department shall determine each eligible employer’s ratable payroll. The department shall then put all eligible employers in the order of their average quarterly decline quotients beginning with the smallest average decline quotient and shall determine, with respect to each employer, the cumulative ratable payroll during the four consecutive quarters ending with the computation date of the employer together with all employers who precede the employer on the list.

The department shall segregate the employers into groups in accordance with cumulative ratable payroll. The limits of the groups are those set out in column B of the table in (c) of this section. Each of these groups shall be identified by the rate class number in column A which is opposite the figures in column B which represent the percentage limits of each group. An employer shall be assigned the experience factor in column C which is opposite the rate class in which the greater part of the employer’s ratable payroll falls. If one-half of the employer’s ratable payrolls falls in one class, and one-half in another, the employer shall be assigned to the lower numbered rate class. An employer may not be assigned to a higher numbered rate class than is assigned to another employer with the same average quarterly decline quotient.

The rate of contributions for each employer is a percentage of the average benefit cost rate multiplied by the employer’s experience factor set out in column C of the table in this subsection opposite the employer’s applicable rate class set out in column A plus the fund solvency adjustment surcharge required under (f) of this section. That percentage is 76 percent beginning January 1, 2009, and 73 percent beginning January 1, 2010. However, the rate of contributions for an employer may not be less than one percent or more than six and one-half percent. The rate of contributions for an employer in rate class 21 may not be less than 5.4 percent. The rate of contributions for an employer must be rounded to the nearest 1/100th of one percent.

The rate of contributions payable by each employee of an employer who is subject to AS

23.20.165

is a percentage of the average benefit cost rate as determined in (e) of this section rounded to the nearest 1/100th of one percent. That percentage is 24 percent beginning January 1, 2009, and 27 percent beginning January 1, 2010. However, the rate of contributions for an employee may not be less than one-half percent or more than one percent.

The department shall determine the average benefit cost rate as follows:

the department shall determine the amount of benefits paid to insured workers during the last three computation years;

the department shall subtract from the amount determined in (1) of this subsection the amount of any benefits reimbursed to the fund and the amount of interest earned on the trust fund balance during those computation years;

the department shall divide the amount determined in (2) of this subsection by the total wages paid by all employers required to pay contributions under this chapter during the first three of the last four computation years;

the department shall determine the amount of total wages subject to contributions under this chapter paid during the preceding computation years;

the department shall determine the amount of all wages paid to insured workers during the preceding computation year;

the department shall subtract from the amount determined in (5) of this subsection the amount of wages paid during the preceding computation year by employers who elect to reimburse the department under AS

23.20.276

and

23.20.277

;

the department shall divide the amount determined in (4) of this subsection by the amount determined in (6) of this subsection; and

the department shall divide the amount determined in (3) of this subsection by the amount determined in (7) of this subsection.

An employer shall pay a fund solvency adjustment surcharge if the reserve rate is less than three percent. The surcharge is a percentage equal to the difference between three percent and the reserve rate, rounded to the nearest 1/100 of one percent. An employer shall receive a fund solvency adjustment credit if the reserve rate is greater than 3.3 percent. The credit is a percentage equal to the difference between 3.3 percent and the reserve rate rounded to the nearest 1/100 of one percent. The solvency surcharge may not be greater than 1.1 percent, and the solvency credit may not be greater than 0.4 percent. However, an employer’s fund solvency adjustment surcharge may not increase more than 0.3 percent from one year to the next year.

COLUMN ARate Class COLUMN BCumulativeRatable Payroll COLUMN CExperienceFactor at least(percent) but less than(percent) 1 5 .40 2 5 10 .45 3 10 15 .50 4 15 20 .55 5 20 25 .60 6 25 30 .65 7 30 35 .70 8 35 40 .80 9 40 45 .90 10 45 50 1.00 11 50 55 1.00 12 55 60 1.10 13 60 65 1.20 14 65 70 1.30 15 70 75 1.35 16 75 80 1.40 17 80 85 1.45 18 85 90 1.50 19 90 95 1.55 20 95
99.99 1.60 21
99.99 1.65.

Click to view

History.

(§ 11 ch 60 SLA 1960; am §§ 7, 8 ch 43 SLA 1973; am §§ 33 — 36 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 115 SLA 1982; am §§ 3 — 5 ch 106 SLA 1984; am §§ 3, 4 ch 116 SLA 1996; am §§ 9, 10 ch 45 SLA 2008; am §§ 4, 5 ch 50 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, in the first sentence of (c), inserted “surcharge” following “fund solvency adjustment”; rewrote (f).

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 50, SLA 2013 (HB 76), see 2013 House Journal 70 — 71.

Sec. 23.20.293.
Requirement to notify the department of a business change and acquisitions.

An employing unit that has a change in ownership, management, or control, or that succeeds to or acquires all or part of another employing unit’s trade or business, shall notify the department in writing in accordance with regulations adopted by the department.

For the purposes of this section, “a change in ownership, management, or control” means a change of person, entity, or responsible party required by law to pay unemployment insurance contributions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 27 SLA 2006)

Sec. 23.20.295.
Rates for successors in business.

When an employing unit, whether or not an employer within the meaning of AS

23.20.520

, succeeds to or acquires substantially all of the operating assets of an organization, trade, or business of another employing unit which at the time of acquisition was an employer subject to this chapter, the payroll records of the predecessor employer shall be transferred as of the date of acquisition to the successor employer for the purpose of determining an employer’s qualifying period and for all other purposes of rate determination.

If the successor employer was an employer subject to this chapter before the date of acquisition, the rate of contributions for the remainder of the calendar year of acquisition is the successor employer’s rate for the period immediately preceding the date of acquisition; the rate for the succeeding years is based on the total of the successor employer’s payrolls consolidated with those of the predecessor.

If the successor was not an employer before the date of acquisition, the rate is the rate applicable to the predecessor employer for the period immediately preceding the date of acquisition provided there was only one predecessor or there were only predecessors with identical rates. If the predecessor rates were not identical, the successor’s rate is the highest rate applicable to any of the predecessor employers with respect to the period immediately preceding the date of acquisition.

This section does not apply to an acquisition, transfer of a trade or business, or transfer of an employers’ workforce conducting the trade or business if the acquisition or transfer is determined by the commissioner

to have been primarily for the purpose of obtaining a more favorable rate of contributions under AS

23.20.280

—

23.20.310

;

to be inequitable to the parties;

to be contrary to the public interest; or

to be a violation of 42 U.S.C. 503(k) (SUTA Dumping Prevention Act of 2004).

History.

(§ 11 ch 60 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 27 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Collateral references. —

Right of successor in business to experience or rating of predecessor for purpose of fixing rate of contributions. 22 ALR2d 673.

Sec. 23.20.297.
Special standards addressing transfers of experience and assignment of rates.

The following standards apply regarding assignment of rates and transfers of experience. For the purposes of AS

23.20.295(d)(1)

and (4),

if an employer transfers its trade or business, its workforce conducting the trade or business, or a portion of that trade, business, or workforce, to another employer and, at the time of the transfer, there is substantially common ownership, management, or control of the two employers, then the unemployment experience attributable to the transferred trade, business, or workforce is transferred to the employer to whom that trade, business, or workforce is transferred; the rates of both employers are recalculated and made effective immediately upon the date of the transfer;

if a person is not an employer at the time the person acquires the trade, business, or workforce of an employer, the unemployment experience of the acquired trade, business, or workforce may not be transferred to that person if the commissioner finds that the person acquired the trade, business, or workforce in order to obtain a lower rate of contributions; instead, the person is assigned the applicable new employer rate under AS

23.20.170(b)

.

An employer who knowingly or recklessly violates or attempts to violate, or who advises another employer to violate, (a) of this section or any other provision of this chapter related to determining the assignment of a contribution rate, or fails to notify the department of a trade, business, or workforce change or acquisition in order to obtain a more favorable rate of contributions, is not eligible for a rate determination under AS

23.20.280

—

23.20.310

. The employer shall pay one of the following as assigned by the department:

contributions at the highest rate provided for the rate year of the violation and for the three succeeding rate years; or

if the employer’s trade, business, or workforce is already at the highest rate for the rate year of the violation, contributions at the highest rate for the three succeeding rate years and a cash penalty of two percent of taxable wages for the rate year of the violation and three succeeding rate years.

A person who knowingly or recklessly advises another person or employer to transfer or acquire a trade, business, or workforce under the provisions of this section in order to obtain a more favorable rate of contributions in violation of (a) of this section is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $5,000.

The department may interpret and apply this section in such a manner as to meet the minimum requirements by the United States Department of Labor.

History.

(§ 3 ch 27 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.299.
Obtaining an unemployment contribution rate by deception.

A person who violates AS

23.20.297(b)

or (c) commits the crime of obtaining an unemployment contribution rate by deception.

A person commits the crime of obtaining an unemployment contribution rate by deception in the first degree if the value of the difference between the rate that had been assigned to the trade, business, or workforce and the rate assigned as a result of the violation is $25,000 or more. Obtaining an unemployment contribution rate by deception in the first degree is a class B felony.

A person commits the crime of obtaining an unemployment contribution rate by deception in the second degree if the value of the difference between the rate that had been assigned to the trade, business, or workforce and the rate assigned as a result of the violation is $500 or more but less than $25,000. Obtaining an unemployment contribution rate by deception in the second degree is a class C felony.

A person commits the crime of obtaining an unemployment contribution rate by deception in the third degree if the value of the difference between the rate that had been assigned to the trade, business, or workforce and the rate assigned as a result of the violation is $50 or more but less than $500. Obtaining an unemployment contribution rate by deception in the third degree is a class A misdemeanor.

A person commits the crime of obtaining an unemployment contribution rate by deception in the fourth degree if the value of the difference between the rate that had been assigned to the trade, business, or workforce and the rate assigned as a result of the violation is less than $50. Obtaining an unemployment contribution rate by deception in the fourth degree is a class B misdemeanor.

A person who attempts to commit the crime of obtaining an unemployment contribution rate by deception commits the crime of attempt under AS

11.31.100

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 27 SLA 2006)

Sec. 23.20.300.
Corrections and adjustments.

Corrections or modifications of an employer’s payroll may be taken into account within two years after the computation date for the purpose of a reduction or increase in the employer’s rate.
When an adjustment is made in an employer’s payroll or in an employer’s average quarterly decline quotient after rates have been assigned, the adjustment may not alter the position of another employer on the schedule or the contribution rate of another employer.
The employer for whom the adjustment in decline quotients is made shall be placed in the class in which another employer with the nearest similar average quarterly decline quotient is placed.

History.

(§ 11 ch 60 SLA 1960; am § 38 ch 9 SLA 1980)

Sec. 23.20.305.
Application for review.

The department shall promptly notify each employer of the rate of contributions for the employer as determined for a calendar year under AS

23.20.280

—

23.20.310

. The determination becomes conclusive upon the employer unless, within 30 days after the notice is mailed to the employer’s last address of record or delivered to the employer, the employer files an application for review and redetermination, setting out the reasons for the application.

If the commissioner grants review, the employer shall be promptly notified and shall be granted a reasonable opportunity for a fair hearing. The commissioner shall make a redetermination and shall notify the employer of the redetermination and the reason for it.

If the commissioner denies a review, the commissioner shall notify the employer of the denial and the reasons for the denial. A redetermination or a denial of review becomes final, unless within 30 days after the notice is mailed to the last address of record of the employer, or delivered to the employer, the employer initiates judicial review in accordance with AS

23.20.445

.

History.

(§ 11 ch 60 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 13 SLA 1962; am §§ 39, 40 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 7 ch 43 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.310.
Definitions for AS 23.20.280 — 23.20.310.

In AS

23.20.280

—

23.20.310

,

“business” means a trade or business or a part of the trade or business;

“computation date” means June 30 of the year immediately preceding the calendar year for which the contribution rates are effective;

“computation year” means the 12 months beginning July 1 and ending June 30;

“knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“payroll” means all wages paid by an employer to individuals in the employ of the employer for service in employment as defined in this chapter;

“qualifying period” means the three-year period of 12 consecutive calendar quarters ending on the computation date; for an employer who has not been subject to this chapter during each of the 12 calendar quarters ending with the computation date, “qualifying period” means the period ending with the computation date and beginning with the first calendar quarter in the 12 quarter period in which the employer was subject to this chapter, but in no event shall an employer’s qualifying period be less than the four consecutive calendar quarters ending with the computation date; an employing unit is subject to this chapter beginning with the start of the first quarter in which the employing unit pays wages under this chapter, and ending with the end of the calendar quarter in which either the employing unit files closing contribution and wage reports under regulations adopted by the department, or the account is closed by the independent action of the commissioner;

“quarterly payroll” means all wages paid by the employer during a calendar quarter;

“ratable payroll” means that part of an employer’s payroll for the four consecutive calendar quarters ending on the computation date as is subject to payment of contributions; for the purpose of determining the rate for a newly subject employer under AS

23.20.280

—

23.20.310

the definition of employment in force at the time that the employer becomes subject to this chapter applies to service performed for the employer before the date on which the employer becomes subject;

“recklessly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“reserve rate” means the ratio of the total amount available for benefits in the unemployment trust fund on September 30, immediately following the computation date, to the payroll of employers required to pay contributions under the provisions of AS

23.20.165

for the 12 consecutive calendar months ending on the computation date, expressed as a percentage.

History.

(§ 11 ch 60 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 13 SLA 1962; am § 9 ch 43 SLA 1973; am §§ 41 — 44, 80 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 27 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

This section was reorganized in 1984 and 2006 to place the defined terms in alphabetical order.

Cross references. —

For definition of employment, see AS

23.20.525

.

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.